Utah statutes.
20A-2-300.5.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Discretionary voter registration agency" means each office designated by the county clerk to provide by-mail voter registration forms to the public.

(2)  "Public assistance agency" means each office in Utah that provides:

(a)  public assistance; and

(b)  state funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to people with disabilities.

